Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 57 O.S. 2021, Section 513.3, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 64, O.S.L. 2022 (57 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 513.3), is amended to read as follows:
Section 513.3. A. When any inmate shall be discharged from an
institution of the Department of Corrections and the intended
residence designated by the inmate is within this state, the
Department of Corrections shall provide the inmate with relevant
documentation to assist the inmate in obtaining post-release
employment and shall coordinate with the Department of Public Safety
Service Oklahoma to provide a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or
a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card if the inmate does not
have a current state-issued identification card or driver license.
The Department of Corrections shall first assist the inmate in

obtaining a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License. If efforts to
assist the inmate in obtaining a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License
fail, the Department of Corrections shall assist the inmate in
obtaining a REAL ID Noncompliant Identification Card.
B. 1. Within nine (9) months prior to the release of an inmate
from custody, the Department of Corrections shall identify whether
the inmate has a current form of state identification and begin the
process of gathering the documentation required for the issuance of
a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License or, if the inmate is unable to
obtain a REAL ID Noncompliant Driver License, a REAL ID Noncompliant
Identification Card pursuant to Section 6-105.3 of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes. If an inmate has any valid form of a state-
issued identification card or driver license, the inmate may avail
himself or herself of the provisions of this section.
2. The Department of Corrections may utilize any funds
available to cover the costs associated with the implementation and
administration of this section and the purchase of REAL ID
Noncompliant Driver Licenses or REAL ID Noncompliant Identification
Cards, including, but not limited to, inmate trust funds, existing
funds of the Department of Corrections and donations.
3. The provisions of this section shall apply only to inmates
who may receive a state-issued identification card pursuant to
Section 1550.42 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. For purposes of assisting an inmate in obtaining post-
release employment, the Department of Corrections shall provide the
inmate with the following documentation:
1. A copy of the vocational training record of the inmate, if
applicable;
2. A copy of the work record of the inmate, if applicable;
3. A certified copy of the birth certificate of the inmate, if
obtainable;
4. A Social Security card or a replacement Social Security card
of the inmate, if obtainable;
5. A resume that includes any trade learned by the inmate and
the proficiency at that trade by the inmate; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 2364 Page 2

6. Documentation that the inmate has completed a practice job
interview.
In addition, the Department shall notify the inmate if he or she
is eligible to apply for a license from a state entity charged with
oversight of an occupational license or certification.
D. The following categories of inmates are not required to
complete resumes or practice job interviews prior to their release
from incarceration:
1. Inmates sixty-five (65) years of age or older;
2. Inmates releasing to medical parole or discharging from a
prison infirmary setting;
3. Inmates releasing from a Department of Corrections Mental
Health Unit;
4. Inmates releasing to the custody of another jurisdiction on
a warrant or detainer;
5. Inmates returning to community supervision from an
intermediate revocation facility; and
6. Inmates that the Department determines would be physically
or mentally unable to return to the workforce upon release from
incarceration.
E. The Department of Corrections is authorized to promulgate
rules and procedures to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
ENR. H. B. NO. 2364 Page 3

Passed the House of Representatives the 13th day of March, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 1st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 2364 Page 4